Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2241.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of July 19, 1979 (P.L.130, No.48), known as the Health Care Facilities Act, is amended by adding chapters to read:CHAPTER 8-DHOSPITAL PRICE TRANSPARENCYSection 801-D. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the 1234567891011121314151617181920 context clearly indicates otherwise:"Ancillary service." A hospital item or service that a hospital customarily provides as part of a shoppable service."Chargemaster." The list of all hospital items or services maintained by a hospital for which the hospital has established a charge."CMS." The Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services."De-identified maximum negotiated charge." The highest charge that a hospital has negotiated with all third-party payors for a hospital item or service."De-identified minimum negotiated charge." The lowest charge that a hospital has negotiated with all third-party payors for a hospital item or service."Discounted cash price." The charge that applies to an individual who pays cash or a cash equivalent for a hospital item or service."Facility fee." A fee charged or billed by a health system or hospital for an outpatient service provided in an off-site health care facility, regardless of the modality through which the service is provided, that is:(1) Intended to compensate the health system or hospital for health care expenses.(2) Separate and distinct from a professional fee. "Gross charge." The charge for an item or service that is reflected on the hospital's chargemaster, absent any discount."Health care facility." As defined in section 802.1."Health system." As defined in section 809.2(e)."Hospital." As defined in section 802.1."Item or service." An item or service, including an individual item or service package, that can be provided by a 20260HB2241PN2942 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 hospital to a patient in connection with an inpatient admission or an outpatient department visit for which the hospital has established a standard charge, including any of the following:(1) A supply or procedure. (2) Room and board. (3) A facility fee. (4) A professional fee. (5) Any other item or service for which the hospital has established a standard charge."Payor-specific negotiated charge." The charge that a hospital has negotiated with a third-party payor for a hospital item or service."Professional fee." A fee charged by a health care practitioner for medical services."Readable format." A digital representation of information in a file that can be easily accessed and comprehended by an individual with reasonable computer skills and imported or read into a computer system for further processing without any additional preparation."Shoppable service." A service that may be scheduled by an individual in advance."Standard charge." The regular rate established by a hospital for a hospital item or service provided to a specific group of paying patients reported in United States dollar amount. The term includes any of the following:(1) The gross charge.(2) The payor-specific negotiated charge.(3) The de-identified minimum negotiated charge.(4) The de-identified maximum negotiated charge.(5) The discounted cash price.20260HB2241PN2942 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Third-party payor." An entity that is legally responsible for payment of a claim for a hospital item or service.Section 802-D. Accessibility. A hospital shall publish all of the following on its publicly accessible Internet website and provide hard copies upon request:(1) A digital file in a readable format and printable format that contains a list of all standard charges for all hospital items or services as specified under section 803-D.(2) A consumer-friendly and printable list of standard charges for a limited set of shoppable services as provided for under section 804-D.Section 803-D. List of standard charges. (a) List.--A hospital shall:(1) Maintain a list of all standard charges for all hospital items or services in accordance with this chapter.(2) Ensure that the list is available to the public in accordance with section 802-D.(b) Standard charges.--The standard charges contained in the list under subsection (a) shall reflect the standard charges applicable to the location of the hospital, regardless of whether the hospital operates in more than one location or operates under the same license as another hospital.(c) Contents.--A hospital shall include all of the following information in the list under subsection (a):(1) A description of each hospital item or service provided by the hospital.(2) The following charges for each individual hospital item or service when provided in either an inpatient setting or an outpatient setting, as applicable, including:20260HB2241PN2942 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (i) The gross charge.(ii) The de-identified minimum negotiated charge.(iii) The de-identified maximum negotiated charge.(iv) The discounted cash price.(v) The payor-specific negotiated charge, delineated by the name of the third-party payor and plan associated with the charge and displayed in a manner that clearly associates the charge with the third-party payor and plan.(vi) A code used by the hospital for the purpose of accounting or billing for the hospital item or service, including the Current Procedural Terminology code, the Healthcare Common Procedure Coding System code, the Diagnosis Related Group code, the National Drug Code or other common identifier.(d) Format.--A hospital shall publish the information contained in the list under subsection (a) in a single digital file that is in a readable format.(e) Display.--(1) A hospital shall post the list under subsection (a) in a prominent location on the home page of the hospital's publicly accessible Internet website or make the list accessible by a dedicated link that is prominently displayed on the home page of the hospital's publicly accessible Internet website.(2) If the hospital operates multiple locations and maintains a single Internet website, the hospital shall post the list for each location that the hospital operates in a manner that clearly associates the list with the applicable location of the hospital and includes charges specific to 20260HB2241PN2942 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 each individual hospital location.Section 804-D. List of shoppable services. (a) Duty to maintain.--Except as provided under subsection (c), a hospital shall maintain and make publicly available a list of the standard charges for each of at least 300 shoppable services provided by the hospital with charges specific to that individual hospital location. The hospital may select the shoppable services to be included in the list, except that the list shall include at least the 70 services specified as shoppable services by CMS. If the hospital does not provide all the shoppable services specified by CMS, the hospital shall include all the shoppable services provided by the hospital.(b) Selection.--In selecting a shoppable service for the purpose of inclusion in the list under subsection (a), a hospital shall:(1) Consider how frequently the service is provided and the billing rate for the service.(2) Prioritize the selection of services that are among the most frequently provided by the hospital.(c) Exception.--If a hospital does not provide 300 shoppable services in the list under subsection (a), the hospital shall include the services specified as shoppable services by CMS. If the hospital does not provide all shoppable services specified by CMS, the hospital shall include all the shoppable services provided by the hospital.(d) Contents.--A hospital shall include all of the following information in the list under subsection (a):(1) A plain-language description of each shoppable service included on the list.(2) The payor-specific negotiated charge that applies to 20260HB2241PN2942 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 each shoppable service included on the list and any ancillary service, delineated by the name of the third-party payor and plan associated with the charge and displayed in a manner that clearly associates the charge with the third-party payor and plan.(3) The discounted cash price that applies to each shoppable service included on the list and any ancillary service or, if the hospital does not offer a discounted cash price for a shoppable service or an ancillary service on the list, the gross charge for the shoppable service or ancillary service, as applicable.(4) The de-identified minimum negotiated charge that applies to each shoppable service included on the list and any ancillary service.(5) The de-identified maximum negotiated charge that applies to each shoppable service included on the list and any ancillary service.(6) A code used by the hospital for purposes of accounting or billing for each shoppable service included on the list and any ancillary service, including the Current Procedural Terminology code, the Healthcare Common Procedure Coding System code, the Diagnosis Related Group code, the National Drug Code or other common identifier.(7) If applicable, each location where the hospital provides a shoppable service and whether the standard charges included in the list apply at the location to the provision of the shoppable service in an inpatient setting or an outpatient setting.(8) If applicable, an indication that a shoppable service specified by CMS is not provided by the hospital.20260HB2241PN2942 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 805-D. Hospital price transparency availability.(a) Accessibility.--A hospital shall ensure that a list under sections 803-D and 804-D comply with the following requirements:(1) Is available free of charge. (2) Is accessible to a common commercial operator of an Internet search engine to the extent necessary for the search engine to index the list and display the list in response to a search query of a user of the search engine.(3) Is formatted in a manner specified under this chapter and by the department. The department shall transmit a notice of the format to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin.(4) Is digitally searchable and printable by service description, billing code and third-party payor.(5) Uses a format and a naming convention specified by the department. The department shall transmit a notice of the format and convention to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin. The department shall consider a naming convention as may be specified by CMS.(b) Compliance.--The department shall ensure that a list under sections 803-D and 804-D does not require any of the following:(1) The establishment of a user account or password or other information of the user.(2) The submission of personal identifying information. (3) Any other impediment, including entering a code to access the list.20260HB2241PN2942 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (c) Template.--In determining the format of a list under sections 803-D and 804-D, the department shall develop a template that a hospital shall use in formatting the list. The department shall transmit the template in a notice to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin. In developing the template as required under this subsection, the department shall have the following duties:(1) Take into consideration applicable Federal guidelines for formatting similar lists required by Federal law and ensure that the design of the template enables an individual to compare the charges contained in the lists maintained by each hospital.(2) Design the template to be substantially like the template used by CMS for the purposes specified in this chapter.(d) Frequency.--A hospital shall update the standard charge information described in sections 803-D and 804-D at least once annually and shall clearly indicate the date that the information was most recently updated, either on the list or in a manner that is clearly associated with the list. The hospital shall make available no less than the three most recent versions of the list as required under this chapter.(e) Readable format.--For purposes of this chapter, the following shall apply to a hospital providing digital files in a readable format:(1) The hospital shall format the file without additional rows or spacing between data.(2) The file shall be readily usable without any additional instructions.20260HB2241PN2942 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (3) The file shall be in a readable format that is widely used by other hospitals for cross-comparison purposes.(f) Construction.--Nothing in this section shall preclude a hospital from using a price estimator tool as provided for in 45 CFR 180.60 (relating to requirements for displaying shoppable services in a consumer-friendly manner) in addition to the list of shoppable services.Section 806-D. Reporting requirements. (a) Frequency.--Each time a hospital creates or updates a list as required under section 803-D or 804-D, the hospital shall submit the list, along with a report on the list, to the department. The department shall determine the form of the report and shall transmit the form of the report in a notice to the Legislation Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin.(b) Complete data.--To be in compliance, any list received by the department shall include a minimum of 95% of all values required under section 803-D or 804-D and shall indicate where values are not applicable according to the determined form and format of the department.(c) Attestation.--An authorized executive of a hospital or health system shall attest, subject to 18 Pa.C.S. § 4904 (relating to unsworn falsification to authorities), that any report or list submitted to the department under this chapter is complete and accurate to the best of the authorized executive's knowledge and belief.(d) Public availability.--The department shall make all reports and lists available on its publicly accessible Internet website no later than 60 days after receipt of each report.(e) Applicability.--A health system may make the report for 20260HB2241PN2942 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 each hospital that it owns or operates, provided that each hospital has its own separate report.Section 807-D. Submission of complaints. The department shall establish an electronic form for individuals to submit complaints for alleged violations of this chapter. The department shall post the electronic form on its publicly accessible Internet website. The department shall also accept complaints via a department customer service telephone number.Section 808-D. Plans of correction. Upon determining that a hospital has violated this chapter or the regulations promulgated under section 811-D, the department may issue a written notice to the hospital stating that a violation has been committed by the hospital. The following shall apply:(1) The department shall state in the written notice that the hospital is required to take immediate action to remedy the violation or, if the hospital is unable to immediately remedy the violation, submit a plan of correction to the department.(2) If the hospital is required to submit a plan of correction to the department under paragraph (1), the department may direct that the violation be remedied within a specified period of time. The hospital must submit the plan of correction no later than 30 days after the date of issuance of the written notice.(3) If the department determines that the hospital is required to take immediate corrective action, the department shall state in the written notice that the hospital is required to provide confirmation to the department that the 20260HB2241PN2942 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 corrective action has been taken.Section 809-D. Sanctions and penalties. (a) Grounds for sanctions.--The department may sanction a hospital for:(1) Violating this chapter or the regulations promulgated under section 811-D.(2) Failing to take immediate action to remedy a violation of this chapter or regulations promulgated under section 811-D.(3) Failing to submit a plan of correction to the department or failing to comply with a plan of correction in accordance with section 808-D.(4) Violating an order previously issued by the department in a disciplinary matter.(5) Any other reason specified in this chapter or the regulations promulgated by the department under section 811-D as necessary to implement this chapter.(b) Civil penalties.--The department may impose a civil penalty for conduct prohibited under subsection (a) each day that a hospital engages in the conduct constituting a separate and distinct incident, as follows:(1) No more than $2,500 for a first incident. (2) No more than $5,000 for a second incident. (3) No more than $10,000 for a third incident. (4) No more than $15,000 for a fourth or subsequent incident.(c) Ineligibility.--A hospital that is sanctioned under subsection (a) for a third or subsequent offense shall be ineligible to receive a payment from the Hospital Uncompensated Care Program under Chapter 11 of the act of June 26, 2001 20260HB2241PN2942 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (P.L.755, No.77), known as the Tobacco Settlement Act, for the fiscal year following the third or subsequent offense.(d) Audits.--The department may audit the publicly accessible Internet websites of hospitals to ensure compliance with this chapter.(e) Administrative proceedings.--The department shall hold hearings and issue adjudications for proceedings conducted under this chapter in accordance with 2 Pa.C.S. (relating to administrative law and procedure) and shall conduct the proceedings in accordance with 1 Pa. Code Pt. II (relating to general rules of administrative practice and procedure).(f) Judicial appeals.--Department adjudications issued under this chapter may be appealed to Commonwealth Court under 42 Pa.C.S. § 763 (relating to direct appeals from government agencies).Section 810-D. Reports. The department shall report annually on the progress in implementing and administering this chapter and submit the report to:(1) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Appropriations Committee of the Senate.(2) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Appropriations Committee of the House of Representatives.(3) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Health and Human Services Committee of the Senate.(4) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Health Committee of the House of Representatives.(5) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Human Services Committee of the House of Representatives.Section 811-D. Regulations. 20260HB2241PN2942 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (a) Temporary regulations.--In order to facilitate the prompt implementation of this chapter, regulations promulgated by the department shall be deemed temporary regulations that shall expire no later than two years following publication. Temporary regulations promulgated under this subsection shall not be subject to:(1) Section 612 of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as The Administrative Code of 1929.(2) Sections 201, 202, 203, 204 and 205 of the act of July 31, 1968 (P.L.769, No.240), referred to as the Commonwealth Documents Law.(3) Sections 204(b) and 301(10) of the act of October 15, 1980 (P.L.950, No.164), known as the Commonwealth Attorneys Act.(4) The act of June 25, 1982 (P.L.633, No.181), known as the Regulatory Review Act.(b) Expiration.--The department's authority to adopt temporary regulations under subsection (a) shall expire two years after the effective date of this subsection. Regulations adopted after this period shall be promulgated as provided by law.(c) Publication.--The department shall submit temporary regulations to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin no later than six months after the effective date of this subsection.(d) Regulations.--The department shall promulgate regulations as provided by law prior to the expiration of the temporary regulations as necessary to implement this chapter.CHAPTER 8-E20260HB2241PN2942 - 14 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 MEDICAL OFFICE PRICE TRANSPARENCYSection 801-E. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Chargemaster." The list of all individual items and services maintained by a medical office for which the medical office has established a charge."De-identified maximum negotiated charge." The highest charge that a medical office has negotiated with all third-party payors for a medical item or service."De-identified minimum negotiated charge." The lowest charge that a medical office has negotiated with all third-party payors for a medical item or service."Discounted cash price." The charge that applies to an individual who pays cash or a cash equivalent for a medical item or service."Gross charge." The charge for a health care item or service that is reflected on the medical office's chargemaster, absent any discount."Health care facility." As defined in section 802.1."Item or service." An item, service or service package that could be provided by a medical office to a patient for which the medical office has established a standard charge, including any of the following:(1) A supply or procedure. (2) Room and board. (3) A facility fee that includes the use of a hospital or other item.(4) A professional fee that includes the service of a 20260HB2241PN2942 - 15 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 health care practitioner.(5) Any other item or service for which a medical office has established a standard charge."Medical office." A health care practitioner, group of health care practitioners or health care facility that charges patients for health care services and procedures. The term does not include a hospital, pharmacy or pharmacist."Payor-specific negotiated charge." A charge that a medical office has negotiated with a third-party payor for a health care item or service."Standard charge." A regular rate established by a medical office for a health care item or service provided to a specific group of paying patients reported in United States dollar amount. The term includes any of the following:(1) The gross charge. (2) The payor-specific negotiated charge.(3) The de-identified minimum negotiated charge.(4) The de-identified maximum negotiated charge. (5) The discounted cash price. "Third-party payor." An entity legally responsible for payment of a claim for an item or service.Section 802-E. Public availability of price information required.A medical office shall make available to patients a consumer-friendly and printable list of the standard charges for the items and services most frequently provided by the medical office in compliance with section 803-E.Section 803-E. List of standard charges.(a) Duty to maintain.--A medical office shall:(1) Maintain a list of the standard charges for the most 20260HB2241PN2942 - 16 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 frequently provided items or services in accordance with this chapter.(2) Ensure that the list is available to the public. (b) Contents.--The list under subsection (a) shall include:(1) A description of each item or service that was provided by the medical office at least 50 times in the preceding calendar year.(2) The following charges for each individual item or service that was provided by the medical office at least 50 times in the preceding calendar year:(i) The gross charge.(ii) The de-identified minimum negotiated charge.(iii) The de-identified maximum negotiated charge.(iv) The discounted cash price.(v) The payor-specific negotiated charge, delineated by the name of the third-party payor and plan associated with the charge and displayed in a manner that clearly associates the charge with the third-party payor and plan.(vi) A code used by the medical office for the purpose of accounting or billing for the hospital item or service, including the Current Procedural Terminology code, the Healthcare Common Procedure Coding System code, the Diagnosis Related Group code, the National Drug Code or other common identifier.(c) Location and accessibility.--A medical office shall inform patients verbally, in writing or electronically about the availability of the standard charges for the most frequently provided items and services prior to rendering health care treatment for the purpose of obtaining informed consent to the 20260HB2241PN2942 - 17 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 treatment.(d) Online data.--A medical office shall establish, maintain and post on the medical office's publicly accessible Internet website a list of the standard charges for the most frequently provided health care services and procedures.(e) Frequency.--The medical office shall update the standard charge information described in subsection (b), and maintained on the list required by subsections (a) and (d), at least once annually. The medical office shall clearly indicate the date that the information was most recently updated.(f) Exemptions.--A medical office that does not have a publicly accessible Internet website is not required to comply with subsection (d). A medical office without a publicly accessible Internet website shall post a written notice on prominent display to patients at the physical location of the medical office.Section 2. This act shall take effect in six months.20260HB2241PN2942 - 18 - 1234567891011121314151617